Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-803
Accredited college of chiropractic, defined.

An accredited college of chiropractic means (1) one which is approved by the board, (2) a legally chartered college of chiropractic requiring for admission a diploma from an accredited high school or its equivalent and, beginning with students entering a college of chiropractic on or after January 1, 1974, at least two years credit from an accredited college or university of this or some other state, which requirement shall be regularly published in each prospectus or catalog issued by such institution, (3) one which conducts a clinic for patients in which its students are required to regularly participate in the care and adjustment of patients, (4) one giving instruction in anatomy, orthopedics, physiology, embryology, chemistry, pathology, health ecology, bacteriology, symptomatology, histology, spinal analysis, diagnosis, roentgenology, neurology, and principles and practice of chiropractic, and (5) one requiring an actual attendance for four college years totaling not less than four thousand hours.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 79, p. 475;

C.S.1929, § 71-1104;

R.S.1943, § 71-180;

Laws 1945, c. 163, § 1, p. 528;

Laws 1973, LB 115, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 405;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 67;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-180;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 244.